North Dakota, session 69, HB1205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-25.1-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-25.1-15. Abandoned infant - Approved location procedure - Reporting immunity.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Abandoned infant" means an infant who has been abandoned at birth at a hospital or
before reaching the age of one year regardless of the location of birth and who has been
left with an on-duty staff member or, if an infant is less than sixty days old, left in a
newborn safety device, at an approved location in an unharmed condition.
b. "Approved location" means a hospital or other location as designated by administrative
rule adopted by the department.
c. "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 23-16.
d. "Newborn safety device" means a device that is:
(1) Physically part of the building at an approved location;
(2) Staffed twenty-four hours a day seven days a week;
(3) Temperature-controlled and ventilated for the safety of newborns;
(4) Equipped with a functional alarm system which automatically triggers an alarm
inside the building when an infant is placed in the device; and
(5) Located in a manner that the interior point of access is in an area that is
conspicuous and visible to the employees of the approved location.
2. a. A parent of an infant less than sixty days old, or an agent of the parent with the parent's
consent, may leave the infant in a newborn safety device at an approved location.
b. A parent of an infant under the age of one year, or an agent of the parent with the
parent's consent, may leave the infant with an on-duty staff member at an approved
location. Neither the parent nor the
c. A parent or agent is not subject to prosecution under sections 14-07-15 and 14-09-22 for
leaving an abandoned infant under this section.
3. An infant left under this section must be accepted at an approved location shall accept an
infant left under this section. TheAn approved location is not required to possess a newborn
safety device.

H. B. NO. 1205 - PAGE 2
4. Except as provided in subsection 6, the approved location may request information regarding
the parents and shall provide the parent or the agent with a medical history form and an
envelope with the approved location's return address. If a hospital accepting thean infant has
the infant's medical history, the hospital is not required to provide the parent or the agent with
a medical history form. Neither theA parent nor theor agent is not required to provide any
information.
4.5. If Except as provided in subsection 6, i f an infant is left at a hospital, the hospital shall provide
the parent or the agent with a numbered identification bracelet to link the parent or the agent
to the infant, unless due to birth of the infant, the infant and parent currentlyalready have an
identification bracelet. Possession of an identification bracelet does not entitle the bracelet
holder to take custody of the infant on demand. If an individual possesses a bracelet linking
the individual to an infant left at a hospital under this section and parental rights have not been
terminated, possession of the bracelet creates a presumption that the individual has standing
to participate in a protection services action brought under this chapter or chapter 27-20.3.
Possession of the bracelet does not create a presumption of maternity, paternity, or custody.
5.6. If an abandoned infant is left in a newborn safety device at an approved location, the approved
location may not inquire as to the identity of the parent or agent. Except as provided in
subsection 10, if the identity of the parent or agent of the abandoned infant is known to the
approved location, the approved location shall keep all information as to the identity of the
parent or agent of the abandoned infant confidential. The parent or agent of the abandoned
infant is not required to provide any information to the approved location but may voluntarily
provide information, including the medical history of the parents or infant.
7. The approved location may provide the parent or the agent with any relevant information,
including information about:
a. Information about theThe safe place for abandoned infant programs;
b. Information about adoptionAdoption and counseling services; and
c. Information about whomWhom to contact if reunification is sought.
6.8. Within twenty-four hours of receiving an infant under this section, the approved location shall
report to the department or authorized agent, as required by section 50-25.1-03, that an infant
has been left at thean approved location. The report may not be made before the parent or the
agent leaves the approved location.
7.9. The approved location and its employees and agents are immune from any criminal or civil
liability for accepting an infant under this section.
8.10. Upon receiving a report of an abandoned infant under this section, the department or
authorized agent shall proceed as required under this chapter if it appears that the abandoned
infant was not harmed, except the department or authorized agent may not attempt to identify
or contact the parent or the agent. If it appears the infant who was left was harmed, the
approved location shall disclose to the department or authorized agent any known information
as to the identity of the parent or agent, and the department or authorized agent shall initiate a
child protection assessment of the matter as required by law.
9.11. If an individual claiming to be the parent or the agent contacts the department or authorized
agent and requests to be reunited with the infant who was leftan abandoned infant, the
department or authorized agent may identify or contact the individual as required under this
chapter and all other applicable laws. If an individual contacts the department or authorized
agent seeking information only, the department or authorized agent may attempt to obtain
information regarding the identity and medical history of the parents and may provide
information regarding the procedures in a case involving an infant who was left at an approved
location. The individual is under no obligation to respond to the request for information, and

H. B. NO. 1205 - PAGE 3
the department or authorized agent may not attempt to compel response to investigate the
identity or background of the individual.
10.12. The department shall develop and implement a public awareness campaign to provide
information, public service announcements, and educational materials regarding this section
to the public, including medical providers, law enforcement, and social service agencies.

H. B. NO. 1205 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1205.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State